Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 1. Writs and Other Forms

§ 5901.
Forms prescribed; alterations.

The forms of writs set out in this chapter, in the several courts of this State, and other proceedings, shall, as near as circumstances will admit, be adopted and used, and shall be sufficient in law; but alterations may be made and allowed by the courts when necessary to adapt them to changes in the law.

§ 5902.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 5903.
Repealed.
1979, No. 2, § 2, eff. Feb. 14, 1979.

§ 5904.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 5905.
Repealed.
1979, No. 2, § 2, eff. Feb. 14, 1979.

§§ 5906-5910.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 5911.
Forcible entry and detainer verdict.

Verdict in Entry and Detainer

STATE OF VERMONT,
At a court of inquiry held at County, ss.
, on the
}
day of A. D. 20 , before E. F. and G. H., Justices of the peace in and for the county of , aforesaid. A. B. of
, complainant, against C. D. of
, respondent. The jury find that the facts alleged in the said A. B.’s complaint are true, and that the said C. D. is guilty thereof, and that the said A. B. ought to have restitution of the premises therein described, without delay. () (the jury find that the facts alleged in the said A. B.’s complaint are not true, and that the said C. D. is not guilty.) If the jury do not find the allegations of the complainant proved, then after the word respondent insert
N. W., Foreman.

Click to view

§ 5912.
Restitution.

Writ of Restitution in Case of Forcible Entry and Detainer

STATE OF VERMONT,
To any sheriff or constable in County, ss.
the State or to ,
}
an indifferent person,
Greeting: Whereas A. B. of, etc., at a court of inquiry of forcible entry and detainer, held at in the county of , on the day of A.D. 20 , before E. F. and G. H., justices of the peace in and for the county of , by the consideration of the said court recovered a judgment against C. D. of , to have restitution of () here describe the premises as in the complaint Therefore, by the authority of the State of Vermont, you are hereby commanded forthwith to remove the said C. D. from the premises, and to cause the said A. B. to have peaceable restitution thereof. You are also hereby commanded, that of the goods, chattels or lands of the said C. D., within your precinct, you cause to be levied, and, the same being disposed of according to law, paid and satisfied to the said A. B., the sum of dollars, being the costs taxed against the said C. D. for the said A. B., by the court aforesaid, together with cents for this writ, and thereof also satisfy yourself for your own fees. Fail not, but service and return make within days from the date hereof. Dated at in the county of , the day of A.D. 20 E. F., Justice of the Peace. G. H., Justice of the Peace.

Click to view

§ 5913.
Habeas corpus.

Writ of Habeas Corpus

(Commencement as in § 5903.
)

To the sheriff of
. . . . . . . .
(or person having the custody of the prisoner,) (
to be designated by his or her name or name of office
) or to any sheriff in the State, or his or her deputy, (

as the case may be

)

Greeting:

By the authority of the State of Vermont, you are hereby commanded that the body of A. B. of
. . . . . . . . , in the prison in
. . . . . . . . , in the county of
. . . . . . . . , (or by you imprisoned and restrained of his or her liberty,) (
as the case may be
) together with the day and cause of his or her commitment (taking and detaining,) by whatsoever name the said A. B. shall be called or charged, you have forthwith before the
. . . . . . . .
court now sitting at, etc., or before me, at
. . . . . . . .
(

if issued by a Justice of the Supreme Court or a Superior judge

) to do and receive what the said court shall then and there consider concerning him or her in this behalf, and have you have this writ.

(
in case of imprisonment or detention by any person not an officer of this State, or of the courts of the United States, insert as follows
) And you are hereby further commended to summon the said
. . . . . . . .
(

naming the person by whom such prisoner is restrained) to appear before said court or before me (as the case may be

) at the time and place aforesaid, and show the cause, if any he or she have, of the taking and of detaining said A. B.

Dated at
. . . . . . . .
in the county of
. . . . . . . . , the
. . . . . . . .
day of
. . . . . . . .
A.D. 20
. . . . . . . .

Judge, etc., or Clerk.

§§ 5914-5923.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 5924.
Repealed.
1979, No. 2, § 2, eff. Feb. 14, 1979.

§ 5925.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.